test/src/morphology/N-njuunn_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - njuuˊnn â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     njuuˊnn+N+Sg+Nom: njuuˊnn
     njuuˊnn+N+Sg+Gen: njuuˊn
     njuuˊnn+N+Sg+Acc: njuuˊn
     njuuˊnn+N+Sg+Ill: njonna
     njuuˊnn+N+Sg+Loc: njuuˊnest
     njuuˊnn+N+Sg+Com: njuuˊnin
     njuuˊnn+N+Ess: njuuˊnnen
     njuuˊnn+N+Par: njuuˊnned
     njuuˊnn+N+Sg+Abe: njuuˊntää
     njuuˊnn+N+Pl+Nom: njuuˊn
     njuuˊnn+N+Pl+Gen: njuuˊni
     njuuˊnn+N+Pl+Acc: njuuˊnid
     njuuˊnn+N+Pl+Ill: njuuˊnid
     njuuˊnn+N+Pl+Loc: njuuˊnin
     njuuˊnn+N+Pl+Com: njuuˊnivuiˊm
     njuuˊnn+N+Pl+Abe: njuuˊnitää
